Maryland, session 2026, HB1581.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
11–510.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the Commission may not
issue a license, or award racing days, for racing at a mile track.
(b) The Commission may issue a license and award racing days only to[:
(1)] the Maryland Jockey Club [of Baltimore City], Inc.[; and
(2) the Laurel Racing Assoc., Inc.], OR A SUCCESSOR THOROUGHBRED
RACETRACK OPERATOR DESIGNATED BY THE MARYLAND STADIUM AUTHORITY
UNDER § 10–646.1 OF THE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE.
– 3 –

Ch. 376 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
11–520.
(a) The requirements of this section are established in recognition of the
significance of the Preakness Stakes to the State.
(b) The Preakness Stakes may be TEMPORARILY transferred to another track in
the State only:
(1) as a result of a disaster or emergency; or
(2) during the reconstruction of Pimlico Race Course, subject to the
approval of the [Maryland Thoroughbred Racetrack Operating Authority] MARYLAND
STADIUM AUTHORITY.
Article – Economic Development
10–601.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Authority” means the Maryland Stadium Authority.
(mm) “Prince George’s County Blue Line Corridor” means an area[,]:
(1) the specific boundaries of which are designated by public local law, in
central Prince George’s County in the intersections of Maryland Route 704, Maryland
Route 214, and Maryland Route 202; OR
(2) THAT IS DESIGNATED AS AN ENTERPRISE ZONE IN PRINCE
GEORGE’S COUNTY UNDER § 5–704 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(nn) [(1)] “Prince George’s County Blue Line Corridor facility” means a facility
located within the Prince George’s County Blue Line Corridor that is:
[(i)] (1) a convention center;
[(ii)] (2) an arts and entertainment amphitheater; [and]
(3) A MARKET HALL;
(4) A SPORTS–RELATED FACILITY, INCLUDING A SPORTS
STADIUM, PRACTICE FIELD, OR TEAM HEADQUARTERS;
(5) A MIXED–USE DEVELOPMENT;
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 376
(6) A TECHNOLOGY INNOVATION CENTER;
(7) RELATED TO COMMERCIAL DEVELOPMENT AND
REVITALIZATION; AND
[(iii)] (8) any other functionally related structures,
improvements, infrastructure, furnishings, or equipment of the facility, including parking
garages.
[(2) “Prince George’s County Blue Line Corridor facility” does not include a
sports facility.]
(vv) (1) “Racing and community development projects” means improvements to
the Pimlico racing facility site, Pimlico site, and training facility site.
(xx) “Racing facility” means the Pimlico site and the training facility site and any
facilities or other improvements on the Pimlico site or the training facility site.
(HHH) “THOROUGHBRED RACETRACK OPERATOR” MEANS THE
MARYLAND JOCKEY CLUB, INC., OR A SUCCESSOR BUSINESS ENTITY DESIGNATED
BY THE AUTHORITY IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 10–646.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
[(hhh)] (III) “Training facility site” means a site for training thoroughbred
racehorses selected or acquired by the [Maryland Thoroughbred Racetrack Operating]
Authority.
10–628.
(c) (1) Unless authorized by the General Assembly, the Board of Public Works
may not approve an issuance by the Authority of bonds, whether taxable or tax exempt,
that constitute tax supported debt or nontax supported debt if, after issuance, there would
be outstanding and unpaid more than the following face amounts of the bonds for the
purpose of financing acquisition, construction, renovation, and related expenses for
construction management, professional fees, and contingencies in connection with:
(xi) Prince George’s County Blue Line Corridor facilities –
[$400,000,000] $450,000,000 $425,000,000.
10–646.1.
(d) (1) In this subsection, “long–term agreement” includes a lease, operating,
joint venture, or management agreement with a minimum term established by the
Authority.
– 5 –

Ch. 376 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) The Authority shall ensure that the following agreements are executed:
(i) subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, a long–term
agreement regarding management and operations [at] OF the Pimlico racing facility site;
and
(ii) agreements between the Authority and project entities for the
planning, design, and construction of a racing facility.
(3) (i) Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the long–term
agreement required under paragraph (2)(i) of this subsection shall:
1. ensure the continuity of the Preakness Stakes at the
Pimlico racing facility site AFTER RECONSTRUCTION BY THE AUTHORITY; AND
2. [be contingent on the conveyance or conveyances in fee
simple of the Pimlico site, in whole or in part, to the Maryland Thoroughbred Racetrack
Operating Authority, Baltimore City, the Baltimore Development Corporation or its
successor or assigns, or any designated project entity; and
3.] establish:
A. the right of the [Authority or an entity designated by the
Authority] THOROUGHBRED RACETRACK OPERATOR to manage and operate the Pimlico
[Clubhouse and Events Facility, grounds, and any] RACING facility SITE;
B. the obligation of the [Authority or an entity designated by
the Authority] THOROUGHBRED RACETRACK OPERATOR to operate, maintain as a
first–class facility, in good condition, repair, and secure the Pimlico racing facility site
during periods identified in the long–term agreement; and
C. the obligation of the [Authority or an entity designated by
the Authority] THOROUGHBRED RACETRACK OPERATOR to cooperate with respect to
the provision of adequate parking and efficient transportation plans around the Pimlico
racing facility site.
(ii) 1. If thoroughbred racing is no longer a lawful activity, or is
otherwise rendered not commercially viable as a result of a change in law or regulation, the
parties to the long–term agreement shall notify the Board of Public Works at least 180 days
before the expiration or termination of the long–term agreement.
2. The notice required under subsubparagraph 1 of this
subparagraph shall contain a [wind–down] plan FOR ALTERNATIVE USES FOR THE
PIMLICO RACING FACILITY SITE THAT PROVIDE A NECESSARY OR BENEFICIAL
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 376
PUBLIC PURPOSE AND A PROCESS FOR COMMUNITY INPUT THAT IS FACILITATED BY
THE PIMLICO COMMUNITY ADVISORY BOARD.
3. The long–term agreement required under paragraph (2)(i)
of this subsection shall [contain dispute resolution provisions, including expedited review,
in the event that] PROVIDE THAT IF there is a dispute among the parties regarding the
existence of the conditions described in subsubparagraph 1 of this subparagraph or the
contents of the [wind–down] plan FOR ALTERNATIVE USES, THE AUTHORITY IS
AUTHORIZED TO ADJUDICATE THE DISPUTE AS A CONTESTED CASE UNDER TITLE
10, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, INCLUDING
AUTHORIZATION TO DELEGATE ALL OR A PORTION OF THE ADJUDICATION TO THE
OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS AS DETERMINED IN THE SOLE DISCRETION
OF THE AUTHORITY.
(i) (1) For the purpose of the planning, design, construction, and ownership of
a racing and community development project under this subtitle, the Authority is the
successor entity to the Maryland Thoroughbred Racetrack Operating Authority.
(2) For the purpose of the operation of a racing and community
development project under this subtitle, the [Maryland Economic Development
Corporation] AUTHORITY is the successor entity to the Maryland Thoroughbred Racetrack
Operating Authority.
(3) The Authority [and the Maryland Economic Development Corporation]
may enter into any agreements necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
(4) [A nonprofit operator of a racing and community development project]
THE THOROUGHBRED RACETRACK OPERATOR:
(i) SHALL BE A NONSTOCK CORPORATION FORMED UNDER THE
LAWS OF THE STATE AND NOT OPERATED FOR PROFIT;
(II) may not be construed to be an agency or instrumentality of the
State or a unit of the Executive Branch for any purpose;
[(ii)] (III) may be replaced with another business entity [with the
concurrent approval of] DESIGNATED BY the Authority [and the Maryland Economic
Development Corporation] IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE TERMS OF THE
LONG–TERM AGREEMENT; and
[(iii)] (IV) shall reimburse the Authority for the cost of a full–time
auditor responsible for overseeing the financial transactions and records relating to racing
and community project costs and ongoing operations.
– 7 –

Ch. 376 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(J) (1) THE THOROUGHBRED RACETRACK OPERATOR SHALL PREPARE
ACCRUAL BASIS FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AT THE CLOSE OF EACH FISCAL YEAR AND
PROVIDE A COPY OF THOSE FINANCIAL STATEMENTS TO THE AUTHORITY
ANNUALLY.
(2) THE ACCRUAL BASIS FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REQUIRED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL DESCRIBE THE CURRENT FINANCIAL
CONDITIONS OF THE THOROUGHBRED RACETRACK OPERATOR AND INCLUDE A
STATEMENT OF OPERATING PROFIT OR LOSS.
(3) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH,
BEGINNING WITH THE FIRST FULL FISCAL YEAR OF THOROUGHBRED RACING
OPERATIONS AT THE RECONSTRUCTED PIMLICO RACING FACILITY, 10% OF THE
ANNUAL NET INCOME OF THE THOROUGHBRED RACETRACK OPERATOR SHALL BE
DISTRIBUTED EACH YEAR IN THE MANNER DESCRIBED UNDER § 9–1A–31(A)(3)(II)
OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE AS LOCAL IMPACT GRANTS TO THE PIMLICO
COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY TO BE DISTRIBUTED TO DESIGNATED
COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ORGANIZATIONS ASSIGNED TO THE IMPACTED
COMMUNITIES FOR COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ACTIVITIES OUTLINED IN THE
ADOPTED PIMLICO AREA JOINT PLAN.
(II) BEFORE CALCULATING THE AMOUNT TO BE DISTRIBUTED
UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE ANNUAL NET INCOME OF THE
THOROUGHBRED RACETRACK OPERATOR SHALL BE REDUCED BY ALL STATE
GRANTS, CONTRIBUTIONS FROM ANY THOROUGHBRED PURSE ACCOUNT, AND THE
CUMULATIVE OPERATING LOSSES CARRIED FORWARD, IF ANY, FROM THE PRIOR
YEARS OF OPERATION.
10–646.4.
(f) For fiscal year [2024] 2027 and each fiscal year thereafter, until the bonds
that have been issued to finance Prince George’s County Blue Line Corridor facilities are
no longer outstanding and unpaid, the Comptroller shall deposit into the Prince George’s
County Blue Line Corridor Facility Fund an amount not to exceed [$27,000,000]
$31,000,000 $29,000,000 from the State Lottery Fund under § 9–120(b)(1)(xi) of the
State Government Article.
10–657.3.
(a) There is a Racing and Community Development Facilities Fund.
(c) Subject to [subsection (f)] SUBSECTIONS (F) AND (G) of this section and to
the extent considered appropriate by the Authority, the money in the Racing and
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 376
Community Development Facilities Fund shall be used to pay the following costs relating
to racing facilities projects:
(1) debt service on Authority bonds;
(2) design and construction costs relating to racing facilities projects;
(3) to the extent authorized by federal tax law, transition costs and
reimbursements, costs of start–up, administration, overhead, and operations related to the
management of improvements to racing facilities projects authorized under this subtitle
and undertaken by the Authority; and
(4) all reasonable charges and expenses related to the Authority’s
administration of the Racing and Community Development Financing Fund and the Racing
and Community Development Facilities Fund and the management of the Authority’s
obligations.
(G) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, FOR FISCAL
YEAR 2028, THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN
APPROPRIATION OF $5,000,000 TO THE RACING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT
FACILITIES FUND.
(2) THE AUTHORITY SHALL USE THE FUNDS INCLUDED IN THE
ANNUAL BUDGET BILL UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION FOR THE
ACQUISITION, PLANNING, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, REPAIR, RENOVATION,
RECONSTRUCTION, SITE IMPROVEMENT, AND CAPITAL EQUIPPING OF
BACKSTRETCH HOUSING FACILITIES AT LAUREL PARK.
Article – State Government
9–120.
(a) The Comptroller shall:
(1) distribute, or cause to be distributed, the State Lottery Fund to pay:
[(1)] (I) on a pro rata basis for the daily and nondaily State lottery games,
the expenses of administering and operating the State lottery, as authorized under this
subtitle and the State budget; and
[(2)] (II) then, except as provided in § 10–113.1 of the Family Law Article,
§ 11–618 of the Criminal Procedure Article, and § 3–307 of the State Finance and
Procurement Article, the holder of each winning ticket or share; AND
(2) CAUSE TO BE DISTRIBUTED TO THE STATE LOTTERY FUND:
– 9 –

Ch. 376 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(I) BEGINNING IN FISCAL YEAR 2027 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR
THEREAFTER, $5,000,000 FROM THE PURSE DEDICATION ACCOUNT, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–1A–28(B)(3)(II) OF THIS TITLE;
(II) BEGINNING IN FISCAL YEAR 2027 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR
THEREAFTER, $3,500,000 FROM THE FUNDS FOR LOCAL IMPACT GRANTS, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–1A–31(A)(4)(I)3 AND (B)(3)(I)2 OF THIS TITLE; AND
(III) BEGINNING IN FISCAL YEAR 2027 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR
THEREAFTER, 80% OF THE AMOUNT OF FUNDS FROM THE RACETRACK FACILITY
RENEWAL ACCOUNT ALLOCATED TO THOROUGHBRED TRACK LICENSEES, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–1A–29(D)(1)(I)2 OF THIS TITLE.
(b) (1) By the end of the month following collection, the Comptroller shall
deposit, cause to be deposited, or pay:
(iv) after June 30, [2021] 2026, into the Racing and Community
Development Financing Fund established under § 10–657.2 of the Economic Development
Article from the money that remains in the State Lottery Fund, after the distribution under
subsection (a) of this section, an amount equal to [at least $17,000,000] $27,000,000
$29,000,000 in each fiscal year until the bonds issued for a racing facility have matured;
(xi) after June 30, 2024, into the Bus Rapid Transit Fund established
under § 2–802.1 of the Transportation Article for bus rapid transit system grants in
accordance with § 2–802 of the Transportation Article from the money that remains in the
State Lottery Fund from the proceeds of all lotteries after the distributions under
subsection (a) of this section and items (i) through (x) of this paragraph:
1. for fiscal year 2025, an amount equal to $27,000,000 in
each fiscal year; and
2. for each fiscal year thereafter, an amount equal to
$17,000,000 in each fiscal year;
(xii) after June 30, [2024] 2026, into the Prince George’s County Blue
Line Corridor Facility Fund established under § 10–657.6 of the Economic Development
Article from the money that remains in the State Lottery Fund from the proceeds of all
lotteries after the distributions under subsection (a) of this section and items (i) through
(xi) of this paragraph, [$27,000,000] $31,000,000 $29,000,000;
(xv) into the General Fund of the State the money that remains in the
State Lottery Fund from the proceeds of all lotteries after the distributions under
subsection (a) of this section and items (i) through (xiv) of this paragraph.
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 376
9–1A–28.
(a) There is a Purse Dedication Account under the authority of the State Racing
Commission.
(b) (1) The Account shall receive money as required under § 9–1A–27 of this
subtitle.
(2) Money in the Account shall be invested and reinvested by the Treasurer
and interest and earnings shall accrue to the Account.
(3) The Comptroller shall:
(i) account for the Account;
(ii) [for fiscal year 2021, transfer $5,000,000, from the portion of the
proceeds in the Account allocated to thoroughbred purses under subsection (c)(1) of this
section, to the Racing and Community Development Facilities Fund established under §
10–657.3 of the Economic Development Article;
(iii)] for fiscal year 2022 and each fiscal year thereafter, on a properly
approved transmittal prepared by the Maryland Stadium Authority, issue a warrant to pay
out $5,000,000, from the portion of the proceeds in the Account allocated to thoroughbred
purses under subsection (c)(1) of this section, to the State Lottery Fund established under
§ 9–120 of this title until any bonds, debt, or other financial instruments issued or made
available by the Maryland Stadium Authority for a racing facility under Title 10, Subtitle
6 of the Economic Development Article reach final maturity;
(III) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2028 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR
THEREAFTER, ON A PROPERLY APPROVED TRANSMITTAL PREPARED BY THE
MARYLAND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION, ISSUE A WARRANT TO PAY
OUT $2,000,000, FROM THE PORTION OF THE PROCEEDS IN THE ACCOUNT
ALLOCATED TO THOROUGHBRED PURSES UNDER SUBSECTION (C)(1) OF THIS
SECTION, TO THE CORPORATION ESTABLISHED UNDER TITLE 10, SUBTITLE 1 OF
THE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE UNTIL ANY BONDS, DEBT, OR OTHER
FINANCIAL INSTRUMENTS ISSUED OR MADE AVAILABLE BY THE CORPORATION FOR
A TRAINING FACILITY SITE AND OTHER IMPROVEMENTS UNDER TITLE 10, SUBTITLE
6 OF THE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE REACH FINAL MATURITY;
[(iv)] (III) beginning with the first full FISCAL year of thoroughbred
racing operations at the [newly constructed] RECONSTRUCTED Pimlico racing facility, for
any fiscal year that the [Maryland Thoroughbred Racetrack Operating Authority]
THOROUGHBRED RACETRACK OPERATOR reports an operating loss [under § 10–1003(c)
of the Economic Development Article], INCLUSIVE OF ALL STATE GRANTS AND
THOROUGHBRED PURSE ACCOUNT CONTRIBUTIONS, IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
– 11 –

Ch. 376 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
10–646.1 OF THE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE, on a properly approved
transmittal prepared by the MARYLAND STADIUM Authority, issue a warrant to pay out
the amount of the operating loss, from the portion of the proceeds in the Account allocated
to thoroughbred purses under subsection (c)(1) of this section, to the [Authority]
THOROUGHBRED RACETRACK OPERATOR; and
[(v)] (IV) on a properly approved transmittal prepared by the State
Racing Commission, issue a warrant to pay out money from the Account in the manner
provided under this section.
(4) The Account is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to § 7–302
of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(5) Except as provided in paragraph (3)(ii) [through (iv)] AND (III) of this
subsection, expenditures from the Account shall only be made on a properly approved
transmittal prepared by the State Racing Commission as provided under subsection (c) of
this section.
Article – Transportation
2–802.
(a) [(1)] In this section [the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Bus], “BUS rapid transit system” means a bus line that operates on at
least some portion of roadway dedicated to buses and offers off–board fare collection or
another form of high efficiency fare collection if a fare is charged.
[(3) “Eligible grantee” means a county or municipal corporation that has:
(i) A bus rapid transit system that operates in the county or
municipal corporation; and
(ii) No ongoing or completed facility, as that term is defined in §
10–601(s)(1), (4), (9), (10), or (11) of the Economic Development Article.]
(b) (1) [Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, when] WHEN a deposit or
payment is made in accordance with § 9–120(b)(1)(xi) of the State Government Article into
the Bus Rapid Transit Fund established under § 2–802.1 of this subtitle, [and there is only
one eligible grantee, then]BEGINNING IN FISCAL YEAR 2027 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR
THEREAFTER, the Department shall award a grant to:
(I) [the eligible grantee] MONTGOMERY COUNTY equal to
$27,000,000; AND [the]:
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 376
(I) THE amount distributed to the Department under §
9–120(b)(1)(xi) of the State Government Article; AND
(II) THE AMOUNT APPROPRIATED UNDER § 7–205.1 OF THIS
ARTICLE
(II) HOWARD COUNTY EQUAL TO $2,000,000.
(2) [(i) If there are two eligible grantees, and one eligible grantee is
Montgomery County, the Department shall distribute $25,000,000 to Montgomery County
and the remaining amount of the deposit or payment under § 9–120(b)(1)(xi) of the State
Government Article to the remaining eligible grantee.
(ii) If more than three counties or municipal corporations are eligible
grantees, and one eligible grantee is Montgomery County, then the Department shall
distribute:
1. Not less than $20,000,000 to Montgomery County if
Montgomery County remains an eligible county; and
2. The total remaining amount of the deposit or payment
under § 9–120(b)(1)(xi) of the State Government Article to the remaining eligible grantees
based on each eligible grantee’s pro rata share of the statewide population.
(iii) If Montgomery County is not an eligible grantee, and more than
one county or municipal corporation are eligible grantees, then the Department shall
distribute the total amount of the deposit payment under § 9–120(b)(1)(xi) of the State
Government Article to the eligible grantees based on each eligible grantee’s pro rata share
of the statewide population.
(3)] (i) [Eligible grantees receiving funds in accordance with this
subsection and § 2–802.1 of this subtitle] MONTGOMERY COUNTY AND HOWARD
COUNTY may use the grant funds for the:
1. Financing and refinancing of the costs related to the
DESIGN, construction, acquisition, improvement, equipping, rehabilitation, and expansion
of bus rapid transit system projects AND OTHER NECESSARY FACILITIES, EQUIPMENT,
AND INFRASTRUCTURE FOR BUS RAPID TRANSIT SYSTEM PROJECTS;
2. Payment of debt service on bonds issued to finance bus
rapid transit system projects;
3. Payment of all reasonable expenses and charges related to
bond issuance and borrowing; and
– 13 –

Ch. 376 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
4. Payment of costs relating to the management and
operation of bus rapid transit system projects.
(ii) If [an eligible grantee] MONTGOMERY COUNTY OR HOWARD
COUNTY uses funds under this section for the payment of debt service on bonds issued to
finance bus rapid transit system projects, [the eligible grantee] MONTGOMERY COUNTY
OR HOWARD COUNTY shall issue bonds in accordance with an ordinance or resolution
which may specify all matters relating to the advertisement, sale, issuance, delivery, and
payment of the bonds, including:
1. The forms, dates, and denominations of the bonds;
2. The principal maturities;
3. The methods to be used in determining interest payable
on the bonds; and
4. Any provisions for registration, redemption before stated
maturity, or the use of facsimile signatures or seals.
(c) The Department:
(1) Shall [distribute grants]:
(I) DEVELOP AND IMPLEMENT A MULTI–YEAR GRANT
AGREEMENT TO ADMINISTER THE GRANT UNDER THIS SECTION WHICH SHALL
REMAIN IN EFFECT UNTIL THE PRINCIPAL OF AND INTEREST ON ANY BONDS ISSUED
BY MONTGOMERY COUNTY OR HOWARD COUNTY UNDER THIS SECTION ARE PAID IN
FULL; AND
(II) DISTRIBUTE THE GRANT under this section to [eligible
grantees] MONTGOMERY COUNTY OR HOWARD COUNTY in a timely manner; and
(2) May not impose any additional conditions on [an eligible grantee]
MONTGOMERY COUNTY OR HOWARD COUNTY on receipt of a grant under this section.
2–802.1.
(a) In this section, “Fund” means the Bus Rapid Transit Fund.
(b) There is a Bus Rapid Transit Fund.
(c) The purpose of the Fund is to:
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 376
(1) Provide grants to [eligible grantees, as defined under § 2–802 of this
subtitle] MONTGOMERY COUNTY OR HOWARD COUNTY; and
(2) Make funding commitments for the issuance of bus rapid transit bonds.
7–205.1.
[For fiscal year 2026 and each fiscal year thereafter, the] THE Governor shall
include in the State budget an appropriation [of $10,000,000] from the Transportation
Trust Fund to the Bus Rapid Transit Fund established under § 2–802.1 of this article for
bus rapid transit system grants in accordance with § 2–802 of this article IN THE
FOLLOWING AMOUNTS:
(1) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026, $10,000,000; AND
(2) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER,
$12,000,000.
Chapter 604 of the Acts of 2025
SECTION 25. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as otherwise
provided by law, all existing laws, regulations, proposed regulations, standards and
guidelines, policies, orders and other directives, forms, plans, memberships, contracts,
property, investigations, administrative and judicial responsibilities, rights to sue and be
sued, and all other duties and responsibilities associated with the functions of Maryland
Thoroughbred Racetrack Operating Authority prior to the taking effect of the termination
provision of Section 6 of Chapter 111 of 2023, as amended by Section 6 of this Act, shall
continue in effect and, as appropriate, are legal and binding on the [Maryland Economic
Development Corporation] MARYLAND STADIUM AUTHORITY until completed,
withdrawn, canceled, modified, or otherwise changed under the law.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Economic Development
10–611.
(a) There is an office known as Maryland Sports in the Authority.
[(e) Maryland Sports is encouraged to promote private fund–raising by
maintaining relationships with each affiliated foundation established under § 10–612 of
this subtitle.]
[10–612.
– 15 –

Ch. 376 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) The Authority may establish one or more affiliated foundations to work with
Maryland Sports, established under § 10–611 of this subtitle.
(b) The purposes of an affiliated foundation are to:
(1) support the State in:
(i) sports bid development;
(ii) sporting event recruitment and retention;
(iii) economic analysis and research relating to sporting events;
(iv) sponsorship of sporting events; and
(v) development of partnerships with public and private entities
designed to sponsor sporting events;
(2) promote regional, national, and international sporting events to be held,
in whole or in part, in the State; and
(3) recruit, market, promote, work to retain, and manage sporting events
that have a positive economic or cultural impact, or otherwise enhance the quality of life of
the State’s citizens.
(c) (1) The Authority shall develop policies for the operation of each affiliated
foundation the Authority establishes.
(2) The Attorney General shall review the policies the Authority develops
under paragraph (1) of this subsection for form and legal sufficiency and, if appropriate,
approve them to govern the affiliated foundation.
(3) The State Ethics Commission shall review the policies the Authority
develops under paragraph (1) of this subsection that pertain to conflicts of interest and, if
appropriate, approve them to govern an official or employee of the Authority also serving as
a director or official of an affiliated foundation.
(d) An affiliated foundation may solicit and receive contributions from businesses,
governmental entities, nonprofit organizations, and individuals interested in the promotion
of sports in the State.
(e) (1) An affiliated foundation established under this section may not be
considered an agency or instrumentality of the State or a unit of the Executive Branch for
any purpose.
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 376
(2) A financial obligation or liability of an affiliated foundation established
and operated under this section may not be considered a debt or an obligation of the State,
the Authority, or Maryland Sports.
(f) (1) Sections 5–501 through 5–504 of the General Provisions Article do not
prohibit an official or employee of the Authority from also becoming a director or an official
of an affiliated foundation organized under this section.
(2) An official or employee of the Authority who serves as a director or
official of an affiliated foundation organized under this section:
(i) may not be compensated, directly or indirectly, by the affiliated
foundation; and
(ii) may be reimbursed for bona fide expenses incurred in the
performance of activities undertaken on behalf of the affiliated foundation as authorized by
the board of directors of that affiliated foundation and by the Authority.
(3) (i) The Authority shall notify the State Ethics Commission in writing
whenever the Authority permits an official or employee of the Authority to serve as a director
or official of an affiliated foundation.
(ii) Within 30 days after receipt of the notice under subparagraph (i)
of this paragraph, the State Ethics Commission shall notify the Authority of any objections
or concerns pertaining to the joint service identified in the notice.
(iii) On receipt of a notice from the State Ethics Commission under
subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the Authority shall reexamine the matter.
(4) The Authority shall report annually to the Governor, the Legislative
Policy Committee of the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, and the State Ethics Commission:
(i) the names of the officials and employees serving as a director or
official of an affiliated foundation; and
(ii) how the policies and procedures adopted under subsection (c) of
this section have been implemented in the preceding year.
(g) An independent certified public accountant hired and paid by the Authority
shall audit an affiliated foundation established under this section each year.
(h) In any fiscal year, after providing the budget committees of the General
Assembly an opportunity for review and comment, the Authority may grant up to $500,000
of the Authority’s available nonbudgeted money to affiliated foundations established under
this section.]
– 17 –

Ch. 376 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SECTION 3. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 10–612.1 and 10–612.2 of Article – Economic Development of the Annotated
Code of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 10–612 and 10–612.1, respectively.
SECTION 2. 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, within 45 days after the
effective date of this Act, all of the functions, powers, duties, books and records (including
electronic records), personal property, equipment, fixtures, assets, liabilities, obligations,
credits, rights, agreements, and privileges previously held by the Maryland Thoroughbred
Racetrack Operating Authority, including those related to the Maryland Jockey Club, Inc.,
and transferred to the Maryland Economic Development Corporation under Section 23 of
Chapter 604 of the Acts of the General Assembly of 2025, shall be transferred to the
Maryland Stadium Authority.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Sections 2 and 3 of this Act
shall take effect July 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in
Section 5 of this Act, this Act shall take effect June July 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 18 –